Utah statutes.
53-2a-604.   State costs for emergency disaster services.

(1)  Subject to this section and Section 53-2a-603, the division may expend or commit to expend money described in Subsection 53-2a-603(2)(a)(i), (ii), or (iii) to fund costs to the state of emergency disaster services if, at the discretion of the division, the expenditure is necessary in response to the disaster.

(2)  Money paid by the division under this section to government entities and private persons providing emergency disaster services are subject to Title 63G, Chapter 6a, Utah Procurement Code.



Amended by Chapter 117, 2013 General Session, (Coordination Clause) 

Amended by Chapter 117, 2013 General Session 

Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 295, 2013 General Session

